Hawaii statutes.
§186-1 Definitions. When used herein:

"Board" means the board of land and
natural resources.

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Owner" shall include any person
leasing the real property of another under a lease having a stated term of not
less than thirty years.

"Stumpage value" means the value that
a willing buyer will pay to a willing seller per thousand board feet for trees
standing and uncut. This value shall not include logging costs. [L 1963, c
141, §2; Supp, §87D-2; HRS §186-1]

Revision Note

Numeric designations
deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next